Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-804
Lottery Division of the Department of Revenue; established; Director of the Lottery Division.

The Lottery Division of the Department of Revenue is hereby established. The division shall be administered by the Director of the Lottery Division who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Tax Commissioner. The division shall administer and regulate the lottery games conducted pursuant to the State Lottery Act.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 20.